Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6104YC (2) 91 ns/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8.94 Major maintenance projects 1 ââ report. 2 On or before January 1, 2027, and each July 1 and January 3 1 thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the 4 general assembly containing a list of future major maintenance 5 projects for state information technology infrastructure 6 of the department and supported entities that will require 7 appropriations by the general assembly. The report must 8 contain all of the following information for each project, as 9 well as a running total requested amount for all projects on 10 the list: 11 1. The project request title. 12 2. A priority category consisting of one of the following: 13 a. Life, health, or safety risk. 14 b. Damaged. 15 c. Compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities 16 Act. 17 d. Scheduled maintenance. 18 e. Efficiency. 19 f. Decommission. 20 3. The estimated immediacy of the project. 21 4. The supported entity in control of the information 22 technology infrastructure. The report may list the department 23 if the department is in control of the information technology 24 infrastructure. 25 5. The amount of the funding request and any comments or 26 funding notes relevant to the project. 27 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 8A.331 Major maintenance projects ââ 28 report. 29 On or before January 1, 2027, and each July 1 and January 30 1 thereafter, the department shall submit a report to the 31 general assembly containing a list of future major maintenance 32 projects for state buildings and facilities that will require 33 appropriations by the general assembly, excluding buildings and 34 facilities under the control of the state board of regents, 35 -1- LSB 6104YC (2) 91 ns/jh 1/ 3 H.F. _____ state department of transportation, department of natural 1 resources, and department of public defense. The report must 2 contain all of the following information for each project, as 3 well as a running total requested amount for all projects on 4 the list: 5 1. The project request title. 6 2. A priority category consisting of one of the following: 7 a. Life, health, or safety risk. 8 b. Damaged. 9 c. Compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities 10 Act. 11 d. Scheduled maintenance. 12 e. Efficiency. 13 f. Demolition. 14 3. The estimated immediacy of the project. 15 4. The state agency in control of the building or facility. 16 5. The amount of the funding request and any comments or 17 funding notes relevant to the project. 18 Sec. 3. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 19 following new subsection: 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. On or before January 1, 2027, and 21 each July 1 and January 1 thereafter, the board shall submit 22 a report to the general assembly containing a list of future 23 major maintenance projects for state buildings, facilities, 24 and information technology infrastructure of the board 25 and institutions governed by the board that will require 26 appropriations by the general assembly. The report must 27 contain all of the following information for each project, as 28 well as a running total requested amount for all projects on 29 the list: 30 a. The project request title. 31 b. A priority category consisting of one of the following: 32 (1) Life, health, or safety risk. 33 (2) Damaged. 34 (3) Compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities 35 -2- LSB 6104YC (2) 91 ns/jh 2/ 3 H.F. _____ Act. 1 (4) Scheduled maintenance. 2 (5) Efficiency. 3 (6) Demolition or decommission. 4 c. The estimated immediacy of the project. 5 d. The institution at which the building, facility, or 6 information technology infrastructure is located. The report 7 may list the board if the building, facility, or information 8 technology infrastructure is not located at an institution. 9 e. The amount of the funding request and any comments or 10 funding notes relevant to the project. 11